Utah statutes.
31A-4-111.   Authority to insure with certain insurers.

A person, government, governmental agency, state, political subdivision of the state, public or private corporation, board, association, estate, trustee, or fiduciary may purchase nonassessable policies of insurance issued by an insurer under Chapter 5, 7, 8, or 14, which is authorized to write that type of insurance under this code.  These authorized insurers may issue that type of insurance to any of the persons named above.



Amended by Chapter 20, 1995 General Session

